Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.250

Persons not guilty for mental reasons deemed convicted.

For purposes of *this act, a person found not guilty as a result of the defense of mental disease or defect shall be deemed to be a convicted person.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 219 s 17.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "this act" literally refers to 1979 ex.s. c 219. As used in this section, the term apparently refers to only sections 12 through 20 of that act, which are codified as RCW 7.68.200 through 7.68.280.

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 219: See note following RCW 70.125.010.